Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2432.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 302(a), (b), (c), (c.1), (d) and (d.1) of the act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act, are amended to read:Section 302. Prize limits.(a) Individual prize limit.--[Except as provided under subsections (d) and (d.1), the] The maximum prize which may be awarded for any single chance shall be [$2,000] $3,000.(b) Aggregate prize limit.--No more than [$35,000] $50,000 in prizes shall be awarded from games of chance by a licensed 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 eligible organization in any seven-day period.[(c) Raffle prize limit.--Up to $15,000 in prizes may be awarded in raffles in any calendar month.(c.1) Total limit.--All prizes awarded under this section shall be subject to the aggregate prize limits under subsection (b).(d) Exception for raffles.--Notwithstanding subsection (b) or (c), a licensed eligible organization may conduct a raffle under section 308 and award a prize or prizes valued in excess of $3,000 each only under the following conditions:(1) The licensing authority has issued a special permit for the raffle under section 308.(2) A licensed eligible organization shall be eligible to receive no more than ten special permits in any licensed term except that a volunteer fire, ambulance, rescue or conservation organization that is not a club licensee shall be eligible to receive 12 special permits in any licensed term.(3) Only one raffle may be conducted under each special permit issued under section 308.(4) Except as provided under subsection (d.1), the total of all prizes awarded under this subsection shall be no more than $150,000 per calendar year, which shall not be subject to the aggregate limit under subsection (b) or (c).(d.1) Additional award.--A volunteer fire, ambulance, rescue or conservation organization may, in addition to the total under subsection (d)(4), award up to $100,000 from raffles which shall not be subject to the aggregate limit under subsection (b), (c) or (d).]* * *20260HB2432PN3237 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 302.1. Raffle prize limits.(a) Raffle prize limit.--The maximum prize which may be awarded for a raffle shall be $5,000.(b) Monthly raffle prize limit.--Up to $30,000 in prizes may be awarded in raffles in a calendar month.(c) Exception for raffles.--A licensed eligible organization may conduct a raffle under section 308 and award a prize or prizes valued in excess of $5,000 each only under the following conditions:(1) The licensing authority has issued a special permit for the raffle under section 308.(2) There shall be no limit on the number of special permits a licensed eligible organization may obtain under section 308.(3) Only one raffle may be conducted under each special permit issued under section 308.(4) Except as provided under subsection (d), the total of all prizes awarded under this subsection shall be no more than $300,000 per calendar year, which is not subject to the limit under subsection (a).(d) Additional award.--A volunteer fire, ambulance, rescue or conservation organization may, in addition to the total under subsection (c)(4), award up to $500,000 which is not subject to the limit under subsection (a).Section 3. Section 307(a), (b) and (b.2) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 307. Licensing of eligible organizations.(a) License required.--The following shall apply:20260HB2432PN3237 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An eligible organization shall not conduct or operate games of chance unless the eligible organization has obtained a valid license as follows:(i) A regular license which must be renewed annually.(ii) A monthly license which permits the eligible organization to conduct games of chance for a 30-consecutive-day period.(2) An auxiliary group of a licensed eligible organization may conduct games of chance using the license issued to the eligible organization if the auxiliary group is listed on the application and license of the eligible organization. An auxiliary group shall not be eligible to obtain a license if the auxiliary group is listed on the application. No additional licensing fee shall be charged for an auxiliary group[. If the eligible organization is a club licensee,] if the auxiliary group is listed on the application. If the auxiliary group is listed on the application of the licensed organization, the games of chance conducted by the auxiliary group must be held on the [club's] licensed organization's licensed premises.(3) Auxiliary groups not listed on the application with an eligible organization may apply for a license as an eligible organization.(b) Issuance.--The licensing authority shall issue a license within [30] 10 days of the submission of an application by an eligible organization that meets the requirements under this chapter.* * *(b.2) Location.--An eligible organization that is not a club 20260HB2432PN3237 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensee that holds a license under subsection (a) [and that is not a club licensee] may conduct small games of chance in the county where the license is issued at a premises which is the operating site of the eligible organization or at a premises or other location not prohibited by local ordinance, and for which the treasurer has been notified. The following shall apply:(1) No more than three licensees, including the licensee that owns or leases the premises, may conduct small games of chance simultaneously at a premises or location.(2) A licensee shall ensure that the conduct of small games of chance by different organizations are separate and clearly identified within a premises or location.[(3) A licensee that is not a club licensee may conduct games of chance simultaneously with the conduct of games of chance by a club licensee on not more than three occasions covering a total of seven days during the year.(4) The following shall apply:(i) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if a club licensee is unable to conduct games of chance at the location listed on its application and license due to natural disaster, fire or other circumstance that renders the location unusable, the club licensee may submit a written request to the district attorney to conduct games of chance in a different location, including the licensed premises of another eligible organization.(ii) A request under subparagraph (i) must include the change in the location and the dates and times the games of chance will be operated at the alternative location.(iii) The district attorney shall approve or deny 20260HB2432PN3237 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the request and shall establish a limit on the duration of the authorization to conduct games of chance at the alternative location. Following the expiration of the authorization period, the club licensee must return to the location specified in its application and license or apply to the licensing authority for a new permanent location. The district attorney may stipulate additional requirements as a condition of approval.(iv) If a club licensee permits another club licensee to use its licensed premises under this paragraph to conduct games of chance, the host club licensee must cease its operation of games of chance during the time the club licensee utilizing its premises is conducting its games of chance.](b.3) Location for a club licensee.--A club licensee may conduct small games of chance in the county where the license is issued at a premises which is the operating site of the club licensee or at a premises or other location not prohibited by local ordinance, for which the treasurer has been notified in accordance with the following:(1) No more than three eligible organizations, including the club licensee, that own or lease the premises, may conduct small games of chance simultaneously at a premises or location.(2) A club licensee shall ensure that the conduct of small games of chance by different organizations are separate and clearly identified within a premises or location.(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if a club licensee is unable to conduct games of chance at the location listed on the club licensee's application and license due to natural 20260HB2432PN3237 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disaster, fire or other circumstance that renders the location unusable, the club licensee may submit a written request to the district attorney to conduct games of chance in a different location, including the licensed premises of another eligible organization.(4) A request under paragraph (3) must include the change in the location and the dates and times the games of chance will be operated at the alternative location.(5) The district attorney shall approve or deny the request and shall establish a limit on the duration of the authorization to conduct games of chance at the alternative location. Following the expiration of the authorization period, the club licensee must return to the location specified in the club licensee's application and license or apply to the licensing authority for a new permanent location. The district attorney may stipulate additional requirements as a condition of approval.(6) If a club licensee permits another club licensee to use the licensed premises under this paragraph to conduct games of chance, the host club licensee must cease the operation of games of chance during the time the club licensee utilizing the premises is conducting the games of chance.* * *Section 4. Sections 308(a) and 502(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 308. Special permits.(a) Issuance and fee.--The licensing authority shall issue a special permit for each raffle in which the licensed eligible organization proposes to award individual prizes in excess of 20260HB2432PN3237 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [$3,000] $5,000. The licensing authority may establish and collect a fee not to exceed $25 for the issuance of special permits under this section.* * *Section 502. Distribution of proceeds.(a) Distribution.--The proceeds from games of chance received by a club licensee shall be distributed as follows:(1) No less than [60%] 40% of the proceeds shall be paid for public interest purposes within one year of the end of the calendar year in which the proceeds were obtained.(2) No more than [40%] 60% of the proceeds obtained in a calendar year may be retained by a club licensee.* * *Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2432PN3237 - 8 - 1234567891011121314